Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Oregon Advocacy  Commissions Office, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the General Fund, the amount of $1,026,068.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount  of $9,841
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2021, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and  federal funds, collected or received by the Oregon Advocacy Com-
missions Office.
SECTION 3.
This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2021 Act takes effect
July 1, 2021.
Passed by Senate May 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5501 (SB 5501-A) Page 1